District of Columbia statutes.
38-506

Exemption from certification.

No certification of immunization shall be required for the admission to a school of a student:

(1)

For whom the responsible person objects in good faith and in writing, to the chief official of the school, that immunization would violate his or her religious beliefs; or

(2)

For whom the school has written certification by a private physician, his or her representative, or the public health authorities that immunization is medically inadvisable.

History

Sept. 28, 1979, D.C. Law 3-20, § 7, 26 DCR 380

Section References

This section is referenced in § 38-502 and § 38-504.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-506.
1973 Ed., § 31-2206.